Illinois, session 104th, HB3509.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Sections 3-3-3 and 3-3-5 and by adding Section 3-3-16 6as follows: 7    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-3)8    Sec. 3-3-3. Eligibility for parole or release. 9    (a) Except for those offenders who accept the fixed 10release date established by the Prisoner Review Board under 11Section 3-3-2.1, every person serving a term of imprisonment 12under the law in effect prior to the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of 1977 shall be eligible for parole when he or 14she has served:15        (1) the minimum term of an indeterminate sentence less 16    time credit for good behavior, or 20 years less time 17    credit for good behavior, whichever is less; or18        (2) 20 years of a life sentence less time credit for 19    good behavior; or20        (3) 20 years or one-third of a determinate sentence, 21    whichever is less, less time credit for good behavior.22    (b) No person sentenced under this amendatory Act of 1977 23or who accepts a release date under Section 3-3-2.1 shall be   HB3509- 2 -LRB104 10636 RLC 20713 b1eligible for parole.2    (c) Subject to Section 3-3-16 Except for those sentenced 3to a term of natural life imprisonment, every person sentenced 4to imprisonment under this amendatory Act of 1977 or given a 5release date under Section 3-3-2.1 of this Act shall serve the 6full term of a determinate sentence less time credit for good 7behavior and shall then be released under the mandatory 8supervised release provisions of paragraph (d) of Section 95-8-1 of this Code.10    (d) (Blank). No person serving a term of natural life 11imprisonment may be paroled or released except through 12executive clemency.13    (d-5) A person serving a term of natural life imprisonment 14is eligible for parole under Section 3-3-16 and mandatory 15supervised release under subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1. 16    (e) Every person committed to the Department of Juvenile 17Justice under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and confined in 18the State correctional institutions or facilities if such 19juvenile has not been tried as an adult shall be eligible for 20aftercare release under Section 3-2.5-85 of this Code. 21However, if a juvenile has been tried as an adult he or she 22shall only be eligible for parole or mandatory supervised 23release as an adult under this Section.24(Source: P.A. 98-558, eff. 1-1-14; 99-628, eff. 1-1-17.) 25    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-5)  HB3509- 3 -LRB104 10636 RLC 20713 b1    Sec. 3-3-5. Hearing and determination. 2    (a) The Prisoner Review Board shall meet as often as need 3requires to consider the cases of persons eligible for parole. 4Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of subsection 5(a) of Section 3-3-2 or in Section 3-3-16 of this Act, the 6Prisoner Review Board may meet and order its actions in panels 7of 3 or more members. The action of a majority of the panel 8shall be the action of the Board. 9    (b) If the person under consideration for parole is in the 10custody of the Department, at least one member of the Board 11shall interview him or her, and a report of that interview 12shall be available for the Board's consideration. However, in 13the discretion of the Board, the interview need not be 14conducted if a psychiatric examination determines that the 15person could not meaningfully contribute to the Board's 16consideration. The Board may in its discretion parole a person 17who is then outside the jurisdiction on his or her record 18without an interview. The Board need not hold a hearing or 19interview a person who is paroled under paragraphs (d) or (e) 20of this Section or released on Mandatory release under Section 213-3-10.22    (c) The Board shall not parole a person eligible for 23parole if it determines that:24        (1) there is a substantial risk that he or she will not 25    conform to reasonable conditions of parole or aftercare 26    release; or  HB3509- 4 -LRB104 10636 RLC 20713 b1        (2) his or her release at that time would deprecate 2    the seriousness of his or her offense or promote 3    disrespect for the law; or4        (3) his or her release would have a substantially 5    adverse effect on institutional discipline.6    (d) (Blank).7    (e) A person who has served the maximum term of 8imprisonment imposed at the time of sentencing less time 9credit for good behavior shall be released on parole to serve a 10period of parole under Section 5-8-1.11    (f) The Board shall render its decision within a 12reasonable time after hearing and shall state the basis 13therefor both in the records of the Board and in written notice 14to the person on whose application it has acted. In its 15decision, the Board shall set the person's time for parole, or 16if it denies parole it shall provide for a rehearing not less 17frequently than once every year, except that the Board may, 18after denying parole, schedule a rehearing no later than 5 19years from the date of the parole denial, if the Board finds 20that it is not reasonable to expect that parole would be 21granted at a hearing prior to the scheduled rehearing date. If 22the Board shall parole a person, and, if he or she is not 23released within 90 days from the effective date of the order 24granting parole, the matter shall be returned to the Board for 25review.26    (f-1) If the Board paroles a person who is eligible for   HB3509- 5 -LRB104 10636 RLC 20713 b1commitment as a sexually violent person, the effective date of 2the Board's order shall be stayed for 90 days for the purpose 3of evaluation and proceedings under the Sexually Violent 4Persons Commitment Act. 5    (g) The Board shall maintain a registry of decisions in 6which parole has been granted, which shall include the name 7and case number of the prisoner, the highest charge for which 8the prisoner was sentenced, the length of sentence imposed, 9the date of the sentence, the date of the parole, and the basis 10for the decision of the Board to grant parole and the vote of 11the Board on any such decisions. The registry shall be made 12available for public inspection and copying during business 13hours and shall be a public record pursuant to the provisions 14of the Freedom of Information Act.15    (h) The Board shall promulgate rules regarding the 16exercise of its discretion under this Section.17(Source: P.A. 98-558, eff. 1-1-14; 99-268, eff. 1-1-16; 1899-628, eff. 1-1-17.) 19    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-16 new)20    Sec. 3-3-16. Long term incarceration; petition for parole.21    (a) A committed person who has attained the age of 55 years 22and served at least 25 consecutive years of incarceration, 23excluding any person sentenced to natural life imprisonment 24for a Class X felony violation of criminal sexual assault, 25aggravated criminal sexual assault, or predatory criminal   HB3509- 6 -LRB104 10636 RLC 20713 b1sexual assault of a child, shall be eligible to submit a 2petition to the Prisoner Review Board seeking parole.3    (b) The Board shall hold a hearing on each petition, and in 4determining whether an eligible person should be granted 5parole, the Prisoner Review Board shall consider the following 6factors as shown by the petition or as shown at the hearing:7        (1) a statement by the petitioner as to the reasons 8    why the petitioner believes he or she should be paroled, 9    including estimated costs of continuing imprisonment. This 10    statement may include a risk assessment by a third party;11        (2) evidence of the petitioner's rehabilitation during 12    the period of the petitioner's incarceration, including 13    remorse for his or her criminal behavior, if applicable, 14    and his or her commitment not to recidivate. Maintaining 15    innocence shall not prevent a person from being granted 16    parole;17        (3) character references and community support for the 18    petitioner's release;19        (4) evidence of the petitioner's participation in 20    educational, vocational, substance abuse, behavior 21    modification programs, life skills courses, re-entry 22    planning, or correctional industry programs and 23    independent efforts at rehabilitation;24        (5) evidence of the petitioner's employment history in 25    the correctional institution;26        (6) the petitioner's criminal history;  HB3509- 7 -LRB104 10636 RLC 20713 b1        (7) the petitioner's disciplinary history while 2    incarcerated in the correctional institution; and3        (8) the petitioner's plans for housing upon release 4    from incarceration.5    If the programs described in paragraph (4) of this 6subsection (b) or employment opportunities were not available 7in the correctional institution, the Board shall not penalize 8the committed person in his or her petition for parole under 9this Section.10    (c) Victims and victims' families shall be notified in a 11timely manner and be provided the opportunity to participate 12at the parole hearing concerning the petitioner's application 13for parole under this Section in accordance with the Rights of 14Crime Victims and Witnesses Act, the Open Parole Hearings Act, 15and this Section.16    (d) Prisoner Review Board hearings under this Section 17shall be conducted by a panel of at least 8 members of the 18Board and a majority vote of the panel is required to grant the 19petition and release the petitioner on parole.20    (e) The Board shall render its decision within a 21reasonable time after hearing and shall state the basis of its 22decision both in the records of the Board and in written notice 23to the person on whose petition it has acted. In its decision, 24the Board shall set the person's time for parole or if it 25denies parole, it shall provide for a rehearing no later than 3 26years after denial of parole.  HB3509- 8 -LRB104 10636 RLC 20713 b1    (f) This Section applies retroactively to all persons 2serving any sentence that was or is imposed before, on, or 3after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 4General Assembly, and the period of incarceration for 5eligibility of each such person to submit a petition for 6parole is based on all previous consecutive years of 7incarceration served by that person before, on, and after the 8effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 9Assembly. This application of this amendatory Act of the 104th 10General Assembly is necessary in order to serve important 11public purposes, including providing a means for incarcerated 12individuals to be restored to useful citizenship, and 13decreasing the rising costs of incarceration. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.  HB3509- 9 -LRB104 10636 RLC 20713 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    730 ILCS 5/3-3-3from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-34    730 ILCS 5/3-3-5from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-55    730 ILCS 5/3-3-16 new